Illinois, session 104th, HB3785.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 5-2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/5-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 5-2)7    Sec. 5-2. When accountability exists. 8    (a) A person is legally accountable for the conduct of 9another when:10        (1) (a) having a mental state described by the statute 11    defining the offense, he or she causes another to perform 12    the conduct, and the other person in fact or by reason of 13    legal incapacity lacks such a mental state;14        (2) (b) the statute defining the offense makes him or 15    her so accountable; or16        (3) (c) either before or during the commission of an 17    offense, and with the intent to promote or facilitate that 18    commission, he or she solicits, aids, abets, agrees, or 19    attempts to aid that other person in the planning or 20    commission of the offense.21    (b) When 2 or more persons engage in a common criminal 22design or agreement, any acts in the furtherance of that 23common design committed by one party are considered to be the   HB3785- 2 -LRB104 10659 RLC 20737 b1acts of all parties to the common design or agreement and all 2are equally responsible for the consequences of those further 3acts. Mere presence at the scene of a crime does not render a 4person accountable for an offense; a person's presence at the 5scene of a crime, however, may be considered with other 6circumstances by the trier of fact when determining 7accountability.8    (c) A person is not so accountable, however, unless the 9statute defining the offense provides otherwise, if:10        (1) he or she is a victim of the offense committed;11        (2) the offense is so defined that his or her conduct 12    was inevitably incident to its commission; or13        (3) before the commission of the offense, he or she 14    terminates his or her effort to promote or facilitate that 15    commission and does one of the following: (i) wholly 16    deprives his or her prior efforts of effectiveness in that 17    commission, (ii) gives timely warning to the proper law 18    enforcement authorities, or (iii) otherwise makes proper 19    effort to prevent the commission of the offense.20    (d) Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 21(f) of Section 12-3.4, subsection (d) of Section 12-3.8, 22subsection (d) of Section 12-3.9, subsection (d-10) of Section 2312-7.3, subsection (d) of Section 12-7.4, and subsection (e) 24of Section 12-7.5 of this Code and paragraph (1) of subsection 25(a) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subsection (b-5) 26of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections, the   HB3785- 3 -LRB104 10659 RLC 20737 b1sentence for an offense based upon legal accountability for 2the conduct of another person in which the accountability is 3determined by the trier of fact beyond a reasonable doubt is as 4follows:5        (1) the sentence for first degree murder based upon 6    legal accountability is the sentence for a Class X felony;7        (2) the sentence for a Class X felony based upon legal 8    accountability is the sentence for a Class 1 felony; 9        (3) the sentence for a Class 1 felony based upon legal 10    accountability is the sentence for a Class 3 felony;11        (4) the sentence for a Class 2 felony based upon legal 12    accountability is the sentence for a Class 4 felony; 13        (5) the sentence for a Class 3 felony based upon legal 14    accountability is the sentence for a Class A misdemeanor; 15        (6) the sentence for a Class 4 felony based upon legal 16    accountability is the sentence for a Class B misdemeanor;17        (7) the sentence for a Class A misdemeanor based upon 18    legal accountability is the sentence for a Class C 19    misdemeanor; and20        (8) the sentence for a Class B misdemeanor, Class C 21    misdemeanor, or a petty offense based upon legal 22    accountability is the sentence for a petty offense. 23(Source: P.A. 96-710, eff. 1-1-10.)